Hawaii statutes.
§206E-8 Use of public lands; acquisition of
state lands. (a) If state lands under the control and management of other
public agencies are required by the authority for its purposes, the agency
having the control and management of those required lands may, upon request by
the authority and with the approval of the governor, convey or lease such lands
to the authority upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed to by the
parties.

(b) Notwithstanding the foregoing, no public
lands shall be conveyed or leased to the authority as above provided if such
conveyance or lease would impair any covenant between the State or any county
or any department or board thereof and the holders of bonds issued by the State
or such county, department, or board. [L 1976, c 153, pt of §1; am L 2014, c
61, §8]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next